Hawaii statutes.
[§37C-3] Debt management policy;
duties of the legislature. Upon receipt from the director of finance, the
legislature shall consider the recommended state debt management policy. The
legislature may establish the policy, with or without modification, by act. [L
2015, c 149, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next